District of Columbia statutes.
38-2573.01

Rules.

Pursuant to the authority granted in § 38-2602(b)(11), the State Superintendent of Education may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter; provided, that the State Superintendent of Education shall issue rules to implement § 38-2571.04(a) by July 1, 2016.

Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-194, § 301, 61 DCR 12411